Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2317
Wild cervidae; duties upon discovery.

Any permitholder under the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act shall, within twenty-four hours after the discovery of wild cervidae in a domesticated cervine animal facility, notify the commission and the department of such occurrence. The commission shall adopt policies providing for the disposition of wild cervidae found in a domesticated cervine animal facility and shall consult with the department before removal of such animals from the facility.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 16.